Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1431
Assistant funeral director; principal functions; supervision required; acts prohibited.

(1) An assistant funeral director may assist a funeral director licensed pursuant to the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act with one or more of the principal functions of funeral directing, including the operation and management of a licensed funeral establishment. Such principal functions shall include, but not be limited to, conducting funeral services, arranging interments, working with families on funeral arrangements, and performing daily management and all permitted necessary funeral activities related to the operation of a licensed funeral establishment. The assistant funeral director shall perform all work under the supervision and control of the licensed funeral director.

(2) An assistant funeral director shall not engage in any aspect of the practice of embalming a dead human body. An assistant funeral director found to be in violation of this subsection shall have any collaborative agreement in Nebraska immediately terminated and employment in Nebraska as an assistant funeral director immediately terminated.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 8.